Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-722
City receipts and expenditures; publication.

The mayor and city council shall cause to be published semiannually a statement of the receipts of the city and an itemized account of the expenditures of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 93, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 4988;

C.S.1922, § 4157;

C.S.1929, § 16-719;

R.S.1943, § 16-722;

Laws 1992, LB 415, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 189.

Receipts and expenditures, publication requirements, village or city having population of not more than one hundred thousand, see section 19-1101.